Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,115
Violation of Central Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact; action to enjoin; performance compelled.

Any person violating the provisions of the Central Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact may be enjoined from continuing such violation. An action may also be brought to compel performance of an obligation created by the compact. The court may require any person who is adjudged responsible to do and perform any and all things within his or her power which are reasonably necessary to fulfill the obligation.

Laws 1986, LB 491, § 38.

Central Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact, see section 71-3522.